Massachusetts, session 194th, H1138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(d) The center shall evaluate and report on individual private and public health care payer
data metrics submitted to the center pursuant to subsection (b), clauses (1) through (5) of section
10 of chapter 12C as well as data submitted to the Division of Insurance under section 6 of
Chapter 176J and section 21 of chapter 176O. The center shall issue public reports on payer data
periodically, including through its annual report. The information shall be reported on an
industry-wide, payer-specific basis and shall include, but not be limited to: (1) operating
margins, (2) total margins, (3) reserves in dollars and as a percent of risk-based capital, (4)
enrollment, and member months (5) total premiums and premiums on a per member per month
basis, (6) total medical expenses and medical expenses on a per member per month basis, and (7)
of 2

total administrative expenses and administrative expenses on a per member per month basis. The
center shall report this information by line of business, where possible.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of chapter 176J of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end of subsection (b) the following sentence:-
The commissioner shall make all information submitted to the division pursuant to the
provisions of this section available to the center for health information and analysis.
SECTION 3. Section 21 of chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(f) The commissioner shall make all information submitted to the division pursuant to the
provisions of this section available to the center for health information and analysis.
of 2